Utah, session 2026, SB83.
Section 1. Section 58-37-4 is amended to read:58-37-4. Schedules of controlled substances -- Schedules I through V -- Findings required -- Specific substances included in schedules.(1)There are established five schedules of controlled substances known as Schedules I, II, III, IV, and V which consist of substances listed in this section.(2)Schedules I, II, III, IV, and V consist of the following drugs or other substances by the official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated:(a)Except as provided in Subsection (3), Schedule I:(i)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, when the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation:(A)Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);(B)Acetyl fentanyl:  (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide);(C)Acetylmethadol;(D)Acryl fentanyl (N-(1-Phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacrylamide);(E)Allylprodine;(F)Alphacetylmethadol, except levo-alphacetylmethadol also known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM;(G)Alphameprodine;(H)Alphamethadol;(I)Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl)ethyl-4-piperidyl] propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido) piperidine);(J)Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4- piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);(K)Benzylpiperazine;(L)Benzethidine;(M)Betacetylmethadol;(N)Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4- piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);(O)Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl, other name: N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2- phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide;(P)Betameprodine;(Q)Betamethadol;(R)Betaprodine;(S)Butyryl fentanyl (N-(1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylbutyramide);(T)Clonitazene;(U)Cyclopropyl fentanyl (N-(1-Phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide);(V)Dextromoramide;(W)Diampromide;(X)Diethylthiambutene;(Y)Difenoxin;(Z)Dimenoxadol;(AA)Dimepheptanol;(BB)Dimethylthiambutene;(CC)Dioxaphetyl butyrate;(DD)Dipipanone;(EE)Ethylmethylthiambutene;(FF)Etizolam  (1-Methyl-6-o-chlorophenyl-8-ethyl-4H-s-triazolo[3,4-c]thieno[2,3-e]1,4-diazepine);(GG)Etonitazene;(HH)Etoxeridine;(II)Furanyl fentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)piperidin-4-yl] furan-2-carboxamide);(JJ)Furethidine;(KK)Hydroxypethidine;(LL)Ketobemidone;(MM)Levomoramide;(NN)Levophenacylmorphan;(OO)Methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-Methoxy-N-(1-phenylethylpiperidinyl-4-yl)-N-acetamide);(PP)Morpheridine;(QQ)MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);(RR)Noracymethadol;(SS)Norlevorphanol;(TT)Normethadone;(UU)Norpipanone;(VV)Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4- piperidinyl] propanamide);(WW)Para-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-Fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide);(XX)PEPAP (1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);(YY)Phenadoxone;(ZZ)Phenampromide;(AAA)Phenibut;(BBB)Phenomorphan;(CCC)Phenoperidine;(DDD)Piritramide;(EEE)Proheptazine;(FFF)Properidine;(GGG)Propiram;(HHH)Racemoramide;(III)Tetrahydrofuran fentanyl (N-(1-Phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carboxamide);(JJJ)Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]- propanamide;(KKK)Tianeptine;(LLL)Tilidine;(MMM)Trimeperidine;(NNN)3-methylfentanyl, including the optical and geometric isomers (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]- N-phenylpropanamide);(OOO)3-methylthiofentanyl (N-[(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);(PPP)3,4-dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methylbenzamide also known as U-47700; and(QQQ)4-cyano CUMYL-BUTINACA.(ii)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers when the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:(A)Acetorphine;(B)Acetyldihydrocodeine;(C)Benzylmorphine;(D)Codeine methylbromide;(E)Codeine-N-Oxide;(F)Cyprenorphine;(G)Desomorphine;(H)Dihydromorphine;(I)Drotebanol;(J)Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt);(K)Heroin;(L)Hydromorphinol;(M)Methyldesorphine;(N)Methylhydromorphine;(O)Morphine methylbromide;(P)Morphine methylsulfonate;(Q)Morphine-N-Oxide;(R)Myrophine;(S)Nicocodeine;(T)Nicomorphine;(U)Normorphine;(V)Pholcodine; and(W)Thebacon.(iii)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, or which contains any of their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers when the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation; as used in this Subsection (2)(a)(iii) only, "isomer" includes the optical, position, and geometric isomers:(A)Alpha-ethyltryptamine, some trade or other names: etryptamine; Monase; -ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine; 3-(2-aminobutyl) indole; -ET; and AET;(B)4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine, some trade or other names: 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy--methylphenethylamine; 4-bromo-2,5-DMA;(C)4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine, some trade or other names: 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-1-aminoethane; alpha-desmethyl DOB; 2C-B, Nexus;(D)2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine, some trade or other names: 2,5-dimethoxy--methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA;(E)2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine, some trade or other names: DOET;(F)4-methoxyamphetamine, some trade or other names: 4-methoxy--methylphenethylamine; paramethoxyamphetamine, PMA;(G)5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;(H)4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine, some trade and other names: 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy--methylphenethylamine; "DOM"; and "STP";(I)3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;(J)3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);(K)3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine, also known as N-ethyl- alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, MDEA;(L)N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine, also known as N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, and N-hydroxy MDA;(M)3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;(N)Bufotenine, some trade and other names: 3-(-Dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxyindole; 3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol; N, N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine; mappine;(O)Diethyltryptamine, some trade and other names: N,N-Diethyltryptamine; DET;(P)Dimethyltryptamine, some trade or other names: DMT;(Q)Ibogaine, some trade and other names: 7-Ethyl-6,6,7,8,9,10,12,13-octahydro-2-methoxy-6,9-methano-5H-pyrido [1', 2':1,2] azepino [5,4-b] indole; Tabernanthe iboga;(R)Lysergic acid diethylamide;(S)Marijuana;(T)Mescaline;(U)Parahexyl, some trade or other names: 3-Hexyl-1-hydroxy-7,8,9,10-tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran; Synhexyl;(V)Peyote, meaning all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as Lophophora williamsii Lemaire, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of such plant, and every compound, manufacture, salts, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its seeds or extracts (Interprets 21 USC 812(c), Schedule I(c) (12));(W)N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;(X)N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;(Y)Psilocybin;(Z)Psilocyn;(AA)Tetrahydrocannabinols, naturally contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis (cannabis plant), except for marijuana as defined in Subsection 58-37-2(1)(aa)(i)(E), as well as synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the cannabis plant, or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, sp. and/or synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity to those substances contained in the plant, such as the following: 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers 3,4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers, and since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions covered;(BB)Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine, some trade or other names: N-ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine, (1-phenylcyclohexyl)ethylamine, N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)ethylamine, cyclohexamine, PCE;(CC)Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine, some trade or other names: 1-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine, PCPy, PHP;(DD)Thiophene analog of phencyclidine, some trade or other names: 1-[1-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexyl]-piperidine, 2-thienylanalog of phencyclidine, TPCP, TCP; and(EE)1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine, some other names: TCPy.(iv)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers when the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:(A)Mecloqualone; and(B)Methaqualone.(v)Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers:(A)Aminorex, some other names: aminoxaphen; 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline; or 4,5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine;(B)Cathinone, some trade or other names: 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone, alpha-aminopropiophenone, 2-aminopropiophenone, and norephedrone;(C)Fenethylline;(D)Methcathinone, some other names: 2-(methylamino)-propiophenone; alpha-(methylamino)propiophenone; 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpropan-1-one; alpha-N-methylaminopropiophenone; monomethylpropion; ephedrone; N-methylcathinone; methylcathinone; AL-464; AL-422; AL-463 and UR1432, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of optical isomers;(E)()cis-4-methylaminorex (()cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);(F)N-ethylamphetamine; and(G)N,N-dimethylamphetamine, also known as N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine; N,N-alpha-trimethylphenethylamine.(vi)Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including their optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers, subject to temporary emergency scheduling:(A)N-[1-benzyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (benzylfentanyl); and(B)N-[1- (2-thienyl)methyl-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (thenylfentanyl).(vii)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of gamma hydroxy butyrate (gamma hydrobutyric acid), including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.(b)Schedule II:(i)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following substances whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:(A)Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate, excluding apomorphine, dextrorphan, nalbuphine, nalmefene, naloxone, and naltrexone, and their respective salts, but including:(I)Raw opium;(II)Opium extracts;(III)Opium fluid;(IV)Powdered opium;(V)Granulated opium;(VI)Tincture of opium;(VII)Codeine;(VIII)Ethylmorphine;(IX)Etorphine hydrochloride;(X)Hydrocodone;(XI)Hydromorphone;(XII)Metopon;(XIII)Morphine;(XIV)Oxycodone;(XV)Oxymorphone; and(XVI)Thebaine;(B)Any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in Subsection (2)(b)(i)(A), except that these substances may not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;(C)Opium poppy and poppy straw;(D)Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of these substances, and includes cocaine and ecgonine, their salts, isomers, derivatives, and salts of isomers and derivatives, whether derived from the coca plant or synthetically produced, except the substances may not include decocainized coca leaves or extraction of coca leaves, which extractions do not contain cocaine or ecgonine; and(E)Concentrate of poppy straw, which means the crude extract of poppy straw in either liquid, solid, or powder form which contains the phenanthrene alkaloids of the opium poppy.(ii)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, when the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation, except dextrorphan and levopropoxyphene:(A)Alfentanil;(B)Alphaprodine;(C)Anileridine;(D)Bezitramide;(E)Bulk dextropropoxyphene (nondosage forms);(F)Carfentanil;(G)Dihydrocodeine;(H)Diphenoxylate;(I)Fentanyl;(J)Isomethadone;(K)Levo-alphacetylmethadol, some other names: levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM;(L)Levomethorphan;(M)Levorphanol;(N)Metazocine;(O)Methadone;(P)Methadone-Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4, 4-diphenyl butane;(Q)Moramide-Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-diphenylpropane-carboxylic acid;(R)Pethidine (meperidine);(S)Pethidine-Intermediate-A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine;(T)Pethidine-Intermediate-B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate;(U)Pethidine-Intermediate-C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylic acid;(V)Phenazocine;(W)Piminodine;(X)Racemethorphan;(Y)Racemorphan;(Z)Remifentanil; and(AA)Sufentanil.(iii)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system:(A)Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical isomers;(B)Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers;(C)Phenmetrazine and its salts; and(D)Methylphenidate.(iv)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers when the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:(A)Amobarbital;(B)Glutethimide;(C)Pentobarbital;(D)Phencyclidine;(E)Phencyclidine immediate precursors: 1-phenylcyclohexylamine and 1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC); and(F)Secobarbital.(v)(A)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of Phenylacetone.(B)Some of these substances may be known by trade or other names: phenyl-2-propanone; P2P; benzyl methyl ketone; and methyl benzyl ketone.(vi)Nabilone, another name for nabilone: ()-trans-3-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-6,6a,7,8,10,10a-hexahydro-1-hydroxy-6, 6-dimethyl-9H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran-9-one.(vii)A drug product or preparation that contains any component of marijuana, including tetrahydrocannabinol, and is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and scheduled by the Drug Enforcement Administration in Schedule II of the federal Controlled Substances Act, Title II, P.L. 91-513.(c)Schedule III:(i)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers whether optical, position, or geometric, and salts of the isomers when the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:(A)Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in dosage unit form containing any stimulant substances listed in Schedule II, which compounds, mixtures, or preparations were listed on August 25, 1971, as excepted compounds under Section 1308.32 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and any other drug of the quantitive composition shown in that list for those drugs or which is the same except that it contains a lesser quantity of controlled substances;(B)Benzphetamine;(C)Chlorphentermine;(D)Clortermine; and(E)Phendimetrazine.(ii)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system:(A)Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing amobarbital, secobarbital, pentobarbital, or any salt of any of them, and one or more other active medicinal ingredients which are not listed in any schedule;(B)Any suppository dosage form containing amobarbital, secobarbital, or pentobarbital, or any salt of any of these drugs which is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for marketing only as a suppository;(C)Any substance which contains any quantity of a derivative of barbituric acid or any salt of any of them;(D)Chlorhexadol;(E)Buprenorphine;(F)Any drug product containing gamma hydroxybutyric acid, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, for which an application is approved under the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, Section 505;(G)Ketamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, some other names for ketamine:  -2-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-(methylamino)-cyclohexanone;(H)Lysergic acid;(I)Lysergic acid amide;(J)Methyprylon;(K)Sulfondiethylmethane;(L)Sulfonethylmethane;(M)Sulfonmethane; and(N)Tiletamine and zolazepam or any of their salts, some trade or other names for a tiletamine-zolazepam combination product: Telazol, some trade or other names for tiletamine: 2-(ethylamino)-2-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexanone, some trade or other names for zolazepam: 4-(2-fluorophenyl)-6,8-dihydro-1,3,8-trimethylpyrazolo-[3,4-e] [1,4]-diazepin-7(1H)-one, flupyrazapon.(iii)Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a U.S. Food and Drug Administration approved drug product, some other names for dronabinol: (6aR-trans)-6a,7,8,10a-tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran-1-ol, or (-)-delta-9-(trans)-tetrahydrocannabinol.(iv)Nalorphine.(v)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing limited quantities of any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid:(A)Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium;(B)Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;(C)Not more than 300 milligrams of dihydrocodeinone per 100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage unit, with a fourfold or greater quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium;(D)Not more than 300 milligrams of dihydrocodeinone per 100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;(E)Not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;(F)Not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;(G)Not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams, or not more than 25 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts; and(H)Not more than 50 milligrams of morphine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.(vi)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, anabolic steroids including any of the following or any isomer, ester, salt, or derivative of the following that promotes muscle growth:(A)Boldenone;(B)Chlorotestosterone (4-chlortestosterone);(C)Clostebol;(D)Dehydrochlormethyltestosterone;(E)Dihydrotestosterone (4-dihydrotestosterone);(F)Drostanolone;(G)Ethylestrenol;(H)Fluoxymesterone;(I)Formebulone (formebolone);(J)Mesterolone;(K)Methandienone;(L)Methandranone;(M)Methandriol;(N)Methandrostenolone;(O)Methenolone;(P)Methyltestosterone;(Q)Mibolerone;(R)Nandrolone;(S)Norethandrolone;(T)Oxandrolone;(U)Oxymesterone;(V)Oxymetholone;(W)Stanolone;(X)Stanozolol;(Y)Testolactone;(Z)Testosterone; and(AA)Trenbolone.(vii)Anabolic steroids expressly intended for administration through implants to cattle or other nonhuman species, and approved by the Secretary of Health and Human Services for use, may not be classified as a controlled substance.(viii)A drug product or preparation that contains any component of marijuana, including tetrahydrocannabinol, and is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and scheduled by the Drug Enforcement Administration in Schedule III of the federal Controlled Substances Act, Title II, P.L. 91-513.(ix)Nabiximols.(d)Schedule IV:(i)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing not more than 1 milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit, or any salts of any of them.(ii)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers when the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:(A)Alprazolam;(B)Barbital;(C)Bromazepam;(D)Butorphanol;(E)Camazepam;(F)Carisoprodol;(G)Chloral betaine;(H)Chloral hydrate;(I)Chlordiazepoxide;(J)Clobazam;(K)Clonazepam;(L)Clorazepate;(M)Clotiazepam;(N)Cloxazolam;(O)Delorazepam;(P)Diazepam;(Q)Dichloralphenazone;(R)Estazolam;(S)Ethchlorvynol;(T)Ethinamate;(U)Ethyl loflazepate;(V)Fludiazepam;(W)Flunitrazepam;(X)Flurazepam;(Y)Halazepam;(Z)Haloxazolam;(AA)Ketazolam;(BB)Loprazolam;(CC)Lorazepam;(DD)Lormetazepam;(EE)Mebutamate;(FF)Medazepam;(GG)Meprobamate;(HH)Methohexital;(II)Methylphenobarbital (mephobarbital);(JJ)Midazolam;(KK)Nimetazepam;(LL)Nitrazepam;(MM)Nordiazepam;(NN)Oxazepam;(OO)Oxazolam;(PP)Paraldehyde;(QQ)Pentazocine;(RR)Petrichloral;(SS)Phenobarbital;(TT)Pinazepam;(UU)Prazepam;(VV)Quazepam;(WW)Temazepam;(XX)Tetrazepam;(YY)Tramadol;(ZZ)Triazolam;(AAA)Zaleplon; and(BBB)Zolpidem.(iii)Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation of fenfluramine which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts, isomers whether optical, position, or geometric, and salts of the isomers when the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible.(iv)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers whether optical, position, or geometric isomers, and salts of the isomers when the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:(A)Cathine ((+)-norpseudoephedrine);(B)Diethylpropion;(C)Fencamfamine;(D)Fenproprex;(E)Mazindol;(F)Mefenorex;(G)Modafinil;(H)Pemoline, including organometallic complexes and chelates thereof;(I)Phentermine;(J)Pipradrol;(K)Sibutramine; and(L)SPA ((-)-1-dimethylamino-1,2-diphenylethane).(v)Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of dextropropoxyphene (alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino-1, 2-diphenyl-3-methyl-2-propionoxybutane), including its salts.(vi)A drug product or preparation that contains any component of marijuana and is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and scheduled by the Drug Enforcement Administration in Schedule IV of the federal Controlled Substances Act, Title II, P.L. 91-513.(e)Schedule V:(i)Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following limited quantities of narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, which includes one or more non-narcotic active medicinal ingredients in sufficient proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture, or preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than those possessed by the narcotic drug alone:(A)not more than 200 milligrams of codeine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;(B)not more than 100 milligrams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;(C)not more than 100 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;(D)not more than 2.5 milligrams of diphenoxylate and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit;(E)not more than 100 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams;(F)not more than 0.5 milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit; and(G)unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains Pyrovalerone having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.(ii)A drug product or preparation that contains any component of marijuana, including cannabidiol, and is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and scheduled by the Drug Enforcement Administration in Schedule V of the federal Controlled Substances Act, Title II, P.L. 91-513. (iii)Gabapentin.(3)(a)As used in this subsection, "pharmaceutical composition" means a drug that has United States Food and Drug Administration approval under 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355 following clinical trials.(b)If the federal government schedules a pharmaceutical composition of a Schedule I controlled substance or  a pharmaceutical composition of any form of a Schedule I controlled substance in a schedule that is not Schedule I, that pharmaceutical composition is deemed scheduled under this section in the same schedule that the pharmaceutical composition is scheduled under 21 U.S.C. Sec. 812 and 21 C.F.R. Part 1308.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.